Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-519
Office of Chief Information Officer; created.

The office of Chief Information Officer is created. The Chief Information Officer shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the Governor with the approval of a majority of the Legislature. For administrative and budgetary purposes, the office of Chief Information Officer shall be located in the Department of Administrative Services which shall provide necessary support services for the office. All administrative and budgetary decisions for the office shall be made by the Chief Information Officer.

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 9;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1509;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 289;

Laws 2006, LB 921, § 15.